Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 23 Mortgages of Real Property

34-23-1.
Effect of unrecorded defeasance.

When a deed purports to contain an absolute conveyance of real estate but is made defeasible by a deed, bond or other instrument, the original deed shall not be thereby affected as against any person, other than the maker of the instrument of defeasance and his or her heirs and devisees and persons having actual notice of it, unless such defeasance is recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city in which the real estate to which it relates is situated prior to the conveyance to such other person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-23-1

.

34-23-2.
Redemption right of mortgagor or vendor with defeasance.

All real estates, conveyed or pledged by mortgage or deed of bargain and sale with defeasance, shall be redeemable by the mortgagor or vendor, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns, on paying the money borrowed thereon, with interest, or by performing the condition on which the real estate was conveyed or mortgaged, deducting the rents and profits which the mortgagee, or any under him or her, may have received over and above the taxes and assessments paid out, and suitable repairs and insurance made by him, her, or them, and all other necessary expenses in the care and management of the premises.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-23-2

.

34-23-3.
Time within which redemption allowed.

No mortgagor, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns shall be allowed to redeem any mortgaged real estate, but shall be forever barred and foreclosed of all equity and right of redemption therein, unless the mortgagor, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns shall pay to the mortgagee, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns the full sum, both principal and interest, due on the mortgage, within three (3) years after the mortgagee, or other person claiming under him or her, shall by process of law, or by peaceable and open entry made in the presence of two (2) witnesses, have taken actual possession of the mortgaged estate and continued the mortgage during the term.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-23-3

.

34-23-4.
Certificate of possession taken by mortgagee.

Whenever possession shall be taken in the presence of witnesses as provided in §

34-23-3

, they shall give to the mortgagee, or other person taking possession under him or her, a certificate of the possession being taken; and the person delivering possession shall acknowledge the delivery have been voluntarily done before a justice of the peace or notary public in the town or city where the mortgaged estate lies, which certificate and acknowledgment shall be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-23-4

.

34-23-5.
Prepayment of mortgage loans.

Every bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit union, finance company and other person(s) making a loan or loans secured by a mortgage or mortgages on real estate located in Rhode Island containing thereon dwelling houses of not more than four (4) dwelling units shall provide in the mortgage note, and in any event the loan or loans shall be upon the condition that the full payment of mortgage may be made at any time after one year from the making of the loan without penalty, provided further, that during the first year, penalty or other charges for prepayment shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the balance due at date of the pay-off. If interest or other charges in connection with the loan or loans shall have been prepaid or included in the face of the mortgage, the holder thereof shall rebate the interest or other charges under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of business regulation.

Alternatively a bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit union, finance company and other person(s) making a nonpurchase money loan or loans secured by a mortgage or mortgages on real estate located in Rhode Island containing on it dwelling houses of not more than four (4) dwelling units, may impose a prepayment penalty or other similar charges for the prepayment of a mortgage loan notwithstanding the prepayment penalty limitation imposed in subsection (a), but only if:

The terms, conditions and amount of the prepayment penalty or other similar charges are prominently and conspicuously disclosed in writing to the borrower;

The borrower agrees and consents to be bound by these terms and conditions; and

Provided no prepayment penalty shall be imposed for any prepayment occurring more than sixty (60) months after the date of such loan.

Any bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit union, finance company or other lender that chooses to offer a mortgage product pursuant to subsection (b) shall have available a similar mortgage product that complies with the limitations set forth in subsection (a) and all applicable federal regulations.

Any prepayment penalty imposed under this section shall not be construed as interest under the provisions of §

6-26-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 117, § 1.

34-23-6.
Loan fees.

In the event any brokerage fees, loan fees, points, finders’ fees, origination fees, or any similar charges shall be imposed on any secured mortgage loan on real estate containing thereon dwelling houses of not more than four (4) dwelling units, those charges shall not be subject to any refund in the event the underlying loan contract is prepaid in full provided that the loan originator, broker or lender gives the following disclosure to the loan applicant in writing: not later than three (3) business days after the application is received. “Notice regarding nonrefundability of loan fees: You have received a good faith estimate of fees and charges showing the loan fees and similar charges you are likely to pay to obtain this loan. As provided in §

34-23-6

, none of these or other fees and charges will be refunded in the event the loan is prepaid in whole or in part.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 246, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 390, § 1.

34-23-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 437, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1989, ch. 310, § 2, effective July 7, 1989.